dictionaries/pt_PT.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY aerisontcdmlupvgbfzáhçqjíxãóéêâúõACMPSBTELGRIFVDkHJONôywUKXZWQÁYÍÉàÓèÂÚ


PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0              anti           [^hirs]

PFX S Y 2
PFX S   0              des            [^h]
PFX S   h              des            h

PFX I Y 4
PFX I   0              in             [^plmr]
PFX I   0              im             p
PFX I   0              i              [lm]
PFX I   0              ir             r

PFX R Y 2
PFX R   0              re             [^s]
PFX R   0              res            s

PFX u Y 1
PFX u   0              sub            [^bhr]

PFX F Y 3
PFX F   0              ultra          .
PFX F   0              super          .
PFX F   0              hiper          .

SFX T Y 6
SFX T   0              bi             .
SFX T   0              tris           s
SFX T   0              tri            [^s]
SFX T   0              tetra          .
SFX T   0              penta          .
SFX T   0              hexa           .

SFX p Y 15
SFX p   0              s              [^ã][^lsmrnzx]
SFX p   0              s              ãe
SFX p   ão             ões            ão
SFX p   l              is             [au]l
SFX p   ol             óis            ol
SFX p   el             éis            [^v]el
SFX p   el             éis            [^áéíóú]vel
SFX p   l              is             [áéíóú]vel
SFX p   l              s              il
SFX p   0              es             [^áéê]s
SFX p   ás             ases           ás
SFX p   és             eses           és
SFX p   ês             eses           ês
SFX p   m              ns             m
SFX p   0              es             [rnzx]

SFX a Y 4
SFX a   0              s              ão
SFX a   il             eis            il
SFX a   os             as             entos
SFX a   0              s              [^aeiouls]

SFX e Y 2
SFX e   0              es             l
SFX e   o              es             ão

SFX f Y 12
SFX f   o              a              [^ã]o
SFX f   o              as             [^ã]o
SFX f   0              a              [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0              as             [^aeiouscn]
SFX f   0              a              [^ê]s
SFX f   0              as             [^ê]s
SFX f   ês             esa            ês
SFX f   ês             esas           ês
SFX f   ão             ona            ão
SFX f   ão             onas           ão
SFX f   e              a              e
SFX f   e              as             e

SFX k Y 6
SFX k   o              a              [^ã]o
SFX k   0              a              [^aeiouscn]
SFX k   0              a              [^ê]s
SFX k   ês             esa            ês
SFX k   ão             ona            ão
SFX k   e              a              e

SFX b Y 4
SFX b   o              0              ão
SFX b   o              s              ão
SFX b   0              ssa            e
SFX b   0              ssas           e

SFX g Y 2
SFX g   ão             oa             ão
SFX g   ão             oas            ão

SFX m Y 5
SFX m   o              amente         o
SFX m   0              amente         u
SFX m   0              mente          [^v][^q][^uo]
SFX m   ável           avelmente      ável
SFX m   ível           ivelmente      ível

SFX H Y 37
SFX H   0              amente         dor
SFX H   ório           oriamente      ório
SFX H   ário           ariamente      ário
SFX H   ático          aticamente     ático
SFX H   áctico         acticamente    áctico
SFX H   ónico          onicamente     ónico
SFX H   ógico          ogicamente     ógico
SFX H   ífero          iferamente     ífero
SFX H   ético          eticamente     ético
SFX H   ístico         isticamente    ístico
SFX H   íssimo         issimamente    íssimo
SFX H   ítico          iticamente     ítico
SFX H   áfico          aficamente     áfico
SFX H   étrico         etricamente    étrico
SFX H   ómico          omicamente     ómico
SFX H   érico          ericamente     érico
SFX H   ótico          oticamente     ótico
SFX H   áceo           aceamente      áceo
SFX H   ástico         asticamente    ástico
SFX H   ício           iciamente      ício
SFX H   ífico          ificamente     ífico
SFX H   íaco           iacamente      íaco
SFX H   ólico          olicamente     ólico
SFX H   órico          oricamente     órico
SFX H   énico          enicamente     énico
SFX H   ódico          odicamente     ódico
SFX H   ópico          opicamente     ópico
SFX H   álico          alicamente     álico
SFX H   érmico         ermicamente    érmico
SFX H   ívoro          ivoramente     ívoro
SFX H   ábico          abicamente     ábico
SFX H   ófilo          ofilamente     ófilo
SFX H   élico          elicamente     élico
SFX H   émico          emicamente     émico
SFX H   ónio           oniamente      ónio
SFX H   ásico          asicamente     ásico
SFX H   ágico          agicamente     ágico

SFX q Y 32
SFX q   ologia         ólogo          ologia
SFX q   ologia         óloga          ologia
SFX q   ologia         ólogos         ologia
SFX q   ologia         ólogas         ologia
SFX q   afia           áfico          afia
SFX q   afia           áfica          afia
SFX q   afia           áficos         afia
SFX q   afia           áficas         afia
SFX q   omania         ómano          omania
SFX q   omania         ómana          omania
SFX q   omania         ómanos         omania
SFX q   omania         ómanas         omania
SFX q   ofobia         ófobo          ofobia
SFX q   ofobia         ófoba          ofobia
SFX q   ofobia         ófobos         ofobia
SFX q   ofobia         ófobas         ofobia
SFX q   ofilia         ófilo          ofilia
SFX q   ofilia         ófila          ofilia
SFX q   ofilia         ófilos         ofilia
SFX q   ofilia         ófilas         ofilia
SFX q   ídio           ida            cídio
SFX q   ídio           idas           cídio
SFX q   ia             a              patia
SFX q   ia             as             patia
SFX q   ura            or             cultura
SFX q   ura            ora            cultura
SFX q   ura            ores           cultura
SFX q   ura            oras           cultura
SFX q   cia            ta             cracia
SFX q   cia            tas            cracia
SFX q   smo            sta            eísmo
SFX q   smo            stas           eísmo
