dictionaries/pt_PT.dic
abade/pb
aborto/pA
acção/pI
acordo/pSE
actividade/Ip
activo/pfmdI
actualizar/XYRSDcv
adaptabilidade/Ip
adoçante/p
adormecer/XYRMD
adverso/fdpm
aeróbico/fp
afegão/ab
agendar/XYMR
agravar/XYSMn
ajuízes/S
aldeão/bp
alegórico/pfH
alemão/eb
algarvio/fp
alinhar/XYMDR
alterável/pI
alto/pfms
alucinogéno/fp
ancião/a
androfobia/q
anfitrião/pb
anglicanismo/p
anão/pb
antepenúltimo/fp
anticristão/ab
antiteísmo/pq
aparelhar/XYSM
apropriado/pfmS
aproveitar/XYRScMDnvu
aproximar/XYcBR
arabesco/p
aracnofilia/q
arbitrário/fpH
aritmético/fp
arqueologia/rqt
arrendar/XYcMDvu
artesão/ab
artrítico/Apf
assonante/p
astrologia/qr
atencioso/fpSm
atómico/pfu
autêntico/pf
autocrático/fpH
autografia/q
aval/te
aventuroso/fpm
bacilo/p
backup/a
barrosão/bp
basáltico/fp
beirão/pb
bequadro/p
bibliofobia/q
biografia/pqr
bênção/a
bobo/fpG
bole/R
bretão/pb
brigada/p
básico/pfH
bug/a
bulas/R
cabeleireiro/fp
cafeicultura/pq
calmo/fpm
camioneta/p
campeão/pbTxV
campeonato/pT
canceroso/pfA
cantoneiro/f
capelão/e
capitalizar/XYcvSR
capitão/be
cardiopatia/pqr
carro/phA
cartesiano/fpi
catalão/eb
categoria/pu
categórico/fpH
cativo/fp
centenário/pfT
charada/pt
charlatão/e
chip/a
chorudo/pfm
ciclo/ptiu
ciclone/pA
cidadão/ab
cigarreiro/f
cinematografia/pqr
classe/pF
cleptomania/pqr
câmbrico/p
cómodo/Ipf
cônsul/xVe
cão/eh
cobri/SR
cobrimos/SR
coimbrão/pb
colonial/ptiA
colérico/pfH
colura/SS
combinatório/fp
comedimos/S
começo/pRS
comissário/pfu
compatibilidade/Ip
complexo/pfmd
comum/pmI
comunicativo/fpI
concelho/p
concessionar/XYu
concessão/pu
concidadão/a
conclusivo/pfIm
conde/pb
condicional/pidIm
condigno/dpmf
conformista/Ip
congelante/Ap
conhecer/XYSMDnv
conjugal/ApEO
consagrar/XYRScDnv
consciencioso/fm
consinto/S
construída/S
construiriam/S
construís/S
contestável/pI
contextualizar/XYncRS
continente/pu
contingente/pmip
contrair/KvSB
contratar/XYRSDnvcu
coprofilia/q
correspondente/pmp
cortesão/ab
cortiçado/f
cotonicultura/pq
credível/dIp
creiamos/S
cretinismo/p
crime/pA
criptologia/qt
cristão/ab
cromático/fpH
crustaceologia/qt
cubra/SRSRSR
cubramos/SRSR
cultura/ptiu
danubiano/f
dócil/a
decorar/XYcDvR
defeituoso/fpm
definição/pI
dele/fp
delegacia/u
democracia/Aqp
democrático/fpAH
departamento/pu
depressivo/fpA
derrapante/Ap
descobrimos/R
descubramos/R
desdenhoso/fpm
desenvergonhado/pfm
deslizante/Ap
desportivo/pfimA
destruíam/S
destruireis/S
destruíreis/S
detonante/Ap
devolução/p
dialecto/pu
digital/pm
diplomático/fpH
direcção/pI
director/pfuxV
discografia/pq
discípulo/fp
discriminativo/Ifp
doloroso/fpm
domabilidade/Ip
domínio/up
dossier/a
droga/pA
drástico/fpH
duplo/fpm
duzentos/a
editar/XYR
editor/fp
eficiente/Ipm
electrónico/pfH
emaranhar/XYS
empedernir/YSM
emprego/pu
empreiteiro/puf
empático/fpH
encalhar/XYScM
encaminhar/XYRSMD
encolerizar/XYS
energético/fp
enferrujar/XYMS
engenhoso/fpm
enraíze/SS
ensinar/XYRMDv
episódico/pfH
erguer/XYR
escravaria/p
escultura/pq
espartano/fp
espécie/up
especial/pmtds
estatutário/pfH
estéril/a
etimológico/fpH
etnomusicologia/prq
evolver/XYRDn
expeças/R
expeço/R
expresso/pfm
externato/p
fadigar/XYS
faraónico/fp
fascismo/pAO
federal/tiA
fictício/fpH
fidelidade/Ip
filo/pu
florescer/XYRMn
fogo/pA
fonofobia/q
fonético/fpH
forja/p
formal/pmtid
fornecedor/fup
fratricídio/pq
frágil/a
fóssil/a
funerário/fp
geográfico/pfH
ágil/a
género/up
gotejante/p
grande/pms
grão/a
guardião/bp
habitar/XYScDnv
heliografia/pq
herbáceo/f
hereditário/pfH
higiénico/fpHA
hiperbólico/fpH
holografia/pq
honorífico/fpH
humano/pfmtidSu
iconografia/pqr
imaculidade/p
imaginário/pfH
impassível/md
impresso/pfR
inchar/XYcMSB
inclusivo/fm
incluso/fp
indivisível/pmd
infértil/a
iniquidade/p
inofensivo/pfm
inscrição/pR
interesseiro/fpSm
invejoso/fpm
invenção/pR
investes/RS
investir/YRSMD
invistamos/RSRS
irmão/ab
irónico/pfH
islâmico/fpA
justiça/pI
justificável/pI
lactente/p
lanço/pu
lascivo/m
leão/pg
letão/pb
liberal/pmtidA
ligar/XYScMn
liso/fp
lunático/fpH
majestático/fpH
mal/e
malandro/pfG
maligno/fpmd
mandrião/bp
maçudo/fp
meça/RR
medes/R
megalomania/pqr
melodramático/fpH
miragem/p
múltiplo/pfpu
modem/a
modesto/fpmIs
monografia/pqr
moço/fph
moral/pmtid
motivação/S
métrico/fpH
mundo/pu
nascer/XYRMnv
nazi/pA
nazista/pA
neurologia/qtr
ninfomania/pqr
não/a
nórdico/fp
objectivo/pfmtidu
obrigado/sk
obstipante/A
obstrua/SS
obstrues/S
obstruirás/S
obstruíssemos/S
oculto/pftim
oftalmologia/qtr
oitocentos/a
originário/pfH
paciente/pmIp
pagão/ab
paleologia/qt
pancadaria/p
parceiro/fp
patriota/piA
pecaminoso/mfp
penalizar/XYcnDS
penitente/pmI
perdulário/pfH
perfeito/pfIms
pescar/XYDR
pictografia/pq
pinguim/p
plotter/a
pão/eh
polar/pu
polissémico/fp
potencial/pmd
pragmático/fpH
presidente/pTxV
processar/XYMDvER
produtivo/pfmidu
profissional/pmi
profundeza/p
projéctil/a
protecção/pSF
prático/fpH
psicografia/pq
psiquiatro/f
puberdade/EIp
questão/pu
quinhentos/a
racionalidade/Ip
racismo/Ap
árctico/pfu
recursivo/pfmd
rede/pu
redundante/pm
regional/ptimu
regulamentar/pAXYcS
regularidade/Ip
representar/XYcDnvu
republicano/fpiA
responsável/pdIm
ressequido/fp
órfão/ab
órgão/a
rizicultura/prq
rotativo/ftidmp
roubo/pA
ruralismo/p
sacristão/e
saúde/RR
saudeis/R
scanner/a
seguro/pfmdIs
semita/ipA
senhorio/fp
senão/a
simbólico/pfH
simples/m
sismologia/qr
são/ab
sobreiral/p
social/pmtiA
socrático/fpH
solúvel/pdI
séssil/a
submarino/pfA
submissão/pI
sudorífico/pfA
suficiente/pIm
sujeito/fp
susceptível/pdm
sustentável/pdI
tecelão/pb
telepatia/pqr
telurismo/p
tema/pu
temerário/pfH
terrorista/Ap
útil/a
tipográfico/fpH
toxicologia/pqr
transalpino/fp
transversal/pmd
trivalência/p
título/up
têxtil/a
veneno/pA
venéreo/fpA
verosímil/Ia
verossímil/Ia
vicentino/fp
vilão/bp
virulência/p
visconde/pb
visitar/XYcDnvR
visível/pmdI
vão/ab
volátil/a
voluntário/fpH
voluptuoso/fdpm
xerografia/pq
zona/pu
